Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.120

Fresh pursuit, arrest.

(1) Any peace officer who has authority under Washington law to make an arrest may proceed in fresh pursuit of a person (a) who is reasonably believed to have committed a violation of traffic or criminal laws, or (b) for whom such officer holds a warrant of arrest, and such peace officer shall have the authority to arrest and to hold such person in custody anywhere in the state.

(2) The term "fresh pursuit," as used in this chapter, includes, without limitation, fresh pursuit as defined by the common law. Fresh pursuit does not necessarily imply immediate pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

[ 1985 c 89 s 12.]